lib/language/fst/safety.foma
# Helper functions for defining 'safe' and 'unsafe' sequences, given a
# conversion tranducer and a putative (but functional) inverse.

# requires: brackets.foma

# Shorthand for composition of conversions, just to make intent clear.
define ROUNDTRIP(A,B) A .o. B;

# Identify strings for which conversion (via A) is *not* losslessly reversible
# (via B).  A is the conversion, B is the putative inverse.
# ROUNDTRIP is ROUNDTRIP(A,B)
# The result does not include the empty string, which is assumed to always
# be safe.
# Intersects with NO'BRACKETS to assert that BRACKETS are not in the
# input alphabet.
define NOTSAFE(roundtrip) NO'BRACKETS .o. _notid(roundtrip);

# The inverse: regex to identify strings for which conversion (via A) is
# losslessly reversible (via B). ROUNDTRIP is ROUNDTRIP(A,B).
# ~NOTSAFE does include the empty string; remove it (by intersecting
# with \BRACKETS+) so that SAFE matches at least 1 character.
define SAFE(roundtrip) [\BRACKETS]+ .o. [~NOTSAFE(roundtrip)];

# The identity conversion is often useful, for example as the inverse conversion
# B if we expect that the input if probably already in our desired variant.
define IDENTITY ?*;

# Check safety of a bracketing function: run round-trip conversion on
# unbracketed texts and verify that the result is an identity function.
# Use `test null` to verify that the "not ok" set is empty;
# use `print shortest-string` to find cases where bracketfunc is broken.
define BRACK'NOT'SAFE(roundtrip,bracketfunc) NO'BRACKETS .o. _notid([
  bracketfunc .o. SWAPBRACKETS .o. [
    [\BRACKETS] |
    [[ "[[" \BRACKETS* "]]" ] .o. REMOVEBRACKETS .o. roundtrip]
  ]*
]);
# Quicker (but less safe) variant: all notsafe strings should have
# brackets in their output.
# Use `test null` to verify that the "not ok" set is empty;
# use `print shortest-string` to find cases where bracketfunc is broken.
define BRACK'NOT'SAFE'FAST(roundtrip,bracketfunc) [
  NOTSAFE(roundtrip) & [ bracketfunc & [?:[\BRACKETS]]+ ]
];
# Assert that the bracket and conversion functions
# are universal (ie, test upper-universal, but it's broken:
# https://github.com/mhulden/foma/issues/74)
# The result of TEST'UPPER'UNIVERSAL should be null; if not, it gives the
# strings not accepted.
define TEST'UPPER'UNIVERSAL(x) ~[[REMOVEBRACKETS .o. x].u];

# Combine these tests!
define BRACK'NOT'OK(roundtrip,bracketfunc) [
  BRACK'NOT'SAFE(roundtrip,bracketfunc) |
  TEST'UPPER'UNIVERSAL(bracketfunc)
];

# ------------------------------------------------------------
# Note: removing empty brackets isn't always safe -- they may be required to
# break up an otherwise-converted phrase.
define REMOVEEMPTYBRACKETS "[[" "]]" -> 0;

# Remove empty regions and merge adjacent regions.
# This is safe to do on unsafe regions, but its not necessarily safe to
# expand safe regions.
define EXPANDREGIONS REMOVEEMPTYBRACKETS .o. [ "]]" "[[" -> 0 ];
# Expand regions across break (non-word) characters
# (Careful: removing breaks from a safe region may make it unsafe.)
define EXPANDREGIONSWORD(BREAKPLUS) EXPANDREGIONS .o. [ "]]" -> 0 || _ BREAKPLUS "[[" ,, "[[" -> 0 || "]]" BREAKPLUS _ ];

# This is a safe way to expand safe regions (only if expanded region is safe)
define SAFE'EXPANDREGIONS'foma'bug(safe) [
  "[[" [[[\BRACKETS] | ["]]":0 "[[":0]]+ .o. safe] "]]" @->
];
# There's a foma bug with negated expressions in transducer replacement
# like the above, so work around this by doing a standard regexp replacement
# to surround the entire region with double double brackets, then remove the
# brackets inside.
define SAFE'EXPANDREGIONS(safe) [
  [ "[[" [[[\BRACKETS] | ["]]":0 "[[":0]]+ .o. safe] "]]" ].u @-> "[[" ... "]]"
] .o. [
  "]]" "[[" -> 0 // "[[" "[[" \BRACKETS* _
] .o. [
  "[[" -> 0 || "[[" _ ,,
  "]]" -> 0 || "]]" _
];

# ------------------------------------------------------------
# Simplest possible bracketing function: brackets entire string if unsafe.
define SIMPLEBRACK(safe) NO'BRACKETS .o. [
  safe -> "[[" ... "]]" || .#. _ .#.
] .o. SWAPBRACKETS;

define SIMPLEBRACK'NOT'OK(roundtrip, safe) [
  BRACK'NOT'OK(roundtrip,SIMPLEBRACK(safe))
];

# ------------------------------------------------------------
# Bracket shortest unsafe string, ignoring word boundaries.
define CLOSEBRACK1(notsafe) notsafe @> ... "]]";
define OPENBRACK1(notsafe) [ "]]" notsafe.r ] @> ... "[[";
define ADDBRACK1(notsafe) [
  NO'BRACKETS .o. CLOSEBRACK1(notsafe) .o. OPENBRACK1(notsafe).r
];

define SHORTUNSAFE'EX(notsafe) ADDBRACK1(notsafe) .o. EXPANDREGIONS;
define SHORTUNSAFE'EX'NOT'OK(roundtrip, notsafe) [
  BRACK'NOT'OK(roundtrip, SHORTUNSAFE'EX(notsafe))
];

define SHORTUNSAFE(roundtrip) SHORTUNSAFE'EX(NOTSAFE(roundtrip));
define SHORTUNSAFE'NOT'OK(roundtrip) [
  BRACK'NOT'OK(roundtrip, SHORTUNSAFE(roundtrip))
];

# Bracket shortest unsafe string, but try to expand unsafe string to word
# boundaries.
define CLOSEBRACK2(notsafe,br) notsafe @> ... "]]" || _ [ br | .#. ];
define OPENBRACK2(notsafe,br) [ "]]" notsafe.r ] @> ... "[[" || _ [ br | .#. ];

define SHORTUNSAFEWORD'EX(notsafe,br) [
  NO'BRACKETS .o. CLOSEBRACK2(notsafe,br) .o. OPENBRACK2(notsafe,br).r
] .o. EXPANDREGIONSWORD(br+);
define SHORTUNSAFEWORD'EX'NOT'OK(roundtrip, notsafe, br) [
  BRACK'NOT'OK(roundtrip, SHORTUNSAFEWORD'EX(notsafe, br))
];

define SHORTUNSAFEWORD(roundtrip, br) [
  SHORTUNSAFEWORD'EX(NOTSAFE(roundtrip), br)
];
define SHORTUNSAFEWORD'NOT'OK(roundtrip, br) [
  BRACK'NOT'OK(roundtrip, SHORTUNSAFEWORD(roundtrip, br))
];

# --------------------------------------------------------------------
# Alternate: bracket longest safe strings, then swap brackets.
# (Longest-leftmost matches like used for LONGSAFE* can require larger state
# machines than shortest-leftmost matches like SHORTUNSAFE* uses.)

define ADDBRACK3(safe) safe @-> "[[" ... "]]";

define LONGSAFE'EX(safe) NO'BRACKETS .o. ADDBRACK3(safe) .o. SWAPBRACKETS;
define LONGSAFE'EX'NOT'OK(roundtrip, safe) [
  BRACK'NOT'OK(roundtrip, LONGSAFE'EX(safe))
];

define LONGSAFE(roundtrip) LONGSAFE'EX(SAFE(roundtrip));
define LONGSAFE'NOT'OK(roundtrip) [
  BRACK'NOT'OK(roundtrip, LONGSAFE(roundtrip))
];

# Same, but respects word boundaries. `br` is a set of non-word characters.
# Uses an extra "<<" token (as defined in brackets.foma) as a string boundary.
define STRB "<<";
define LONGSAFEWORD'EX(safe, br) NO'BRACKETS .o. [
 [..] -> STRB || .#. _ , _ .#.
] .o. [
  [ [ [br|STRB] (?* [br|STRB]) ] .o. [ STRB -> 0 ] .o. safe].u
    @-> "[[" ... "]]"
] .o. SWAPBRACKETS .o. [
  STRB -> 0
] .o. EXPANDREGIONSWORD(br+);
define LONGSAFEWORD'EX'NOT'OK(roundtrip, safe, br) [
  BRACK'NOT'OK(roundtrip, LONGSAFEWORD'EX(safe, br))
];

define LONGSAFEWORD(roundtrip, br) LONGSAFEWORD'EX(SAFE(roundtrip), br);
define LONGSAFEWORD'NOT'OK(roundtrip, br) [
  LONGSAFEWORD'EX'NOT'OK(roundtrip, SAFE(roundtrip), br)
];
